North Dakota statutes. TITLE 12 Corrections, Parole, and Probation
CHAPTER 12-65 Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision
12-65-02.
Custody and detention of offender for violation of terms and conditions of compact supervision — Hearing and waiver — Report to sending state.

Whenever it is alleged that an offender under compact supervision by the state has violated any terms and conditions of supervision under the compact for the supervision of adult offenders, the compact administrator may issue a warrant to take the offender into custody and detain the offender and request that the sending state retake the offender. The warrant must be entered into the national crime information center file with nationwide extradition and no bond amount. If there is probable cause to believe an offender has violated any of the terms or conditions of supervision under the compact for the supervision of adult offenders, a parole and probation officer or any peace officer directed by a parole and probation officer shall take the offender into custody and detain the offender in a correctional facility pending application for a warrant of arrest and authority to detain. The offender may not be released on bail pending the probable cause hearing under this chapter. The offender is entitled to a hearing to be held in accordance with this chapter within a reasonable time after being taken into custody to determine whether there is probable cause to find that the offender violated any of the terms and conditions of parole or probation while under compact supervision. The offender may waive the hearing and admit there is probable cause to find that the offender violated any of the terms and conditions of parole or probation while under compact supervision. As soon as practical after the hearing or waiver of the hearing, the compact administrator shall furnish a copy of the hearing record and make a report to the sending state with findings of fact regarding the violations of the terms and conditions of parole or probation while under compact supervision and shall make recommendations regarding the disposition of the offender. If it appears to the compact administrator that the sending state will retake the offender, the compact administrator may detain the offender for a reasonable period after the hearing or waiver in order for the sending state to arrange for retaking the offender.

Whenever a receiving state that is supervising an offender for the state issues a mandatory retaking of that offender, the parole board or the court with jurisdiction shall issue a warrant. The warrant must be entered into the national crime information center file with nationwide extradition and no bond amount. If requested by the state, the receiving state shall establish probable cause when the offender is apprehended.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 102, § 4; 2021, ch. 102, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

12-65-03.
Waiver of extradition.

Authorized officers of a sending state may enter this state and apprehend and retake any offender from the sending state who is present in this state pursuant to the compact for the supervision of adult offenders. The sending state shall establish the authority of the officers and the identity of the offender before the officers may retake the offender back to the sending state. All legal requirements to obtain extradition of fugitives from justice are hereby expressly waived. The decision of the sending state to retake an offender is conclusive upon and not reviewable by this state. If the offender is alleged to have committed a criminal offense within this state, or if there is any criminal charge pending against an offender in this state, and unless permission has been obtained from the state’s attorney in the county in which the criminal offense is alleged to have occurred, the sending state may not retake the offender from this state until the offender has been discharged from prosecution or released from imprisonment for the criminal offense.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 102, § 4.

12-65-04.
Who may hold a hearing.

A hearing pursuant to this chapter must be before a hearing officer designated by the compact administrator. The hearing may not be conducted by a person directly involved in the supervision of the offender or by the person bringing the allegation of a probation or parole violation.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 102, § 4.

12-65-05.
Conduct of hearing.

The offender is entitled to:

Notice in writing of the nature and content of the allegations against the offender and that the purpose of the hearing is to determine whether there is probable cause to believe that the offender has violated any terms and conditions of compact supervision that may result in the sending state retaking the offender and may result in revocation of parole or probation in the sending state.

Opportunity to be heard in person and present witnesses and evidence.

The opportunity to confront and cross-examine adverse witnesses, unless the hearing officer determines that confrontation may present a risk of harm to a witness.

Written findings of fact and an explanation of the decision.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 102, § 4.

12-65-06.
Force and effect of hearings in other states.

In a case of alleged parole or probation violation by an offender being supervised in another state pursuant to the interstate compact for the supervision of adult offenders, any appropriate judicial or administrative officer or agency in another state is authorized to hold a hearing on the alleged violation. Upon receipt of the record of a parole or probation violation hearing held in another state pursuant to a statute substantially similar to this chapter, the record has the same standing and effect as though the proceeding of which it is a record was had before the appropriate officer or officers in this state, and any recommendations contained in or accompanying the record must be fully considered by the appropriate officer or officers of this state in making disposition of the matter.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 102, § 4.

12-65-07.
Violation of compact — Penalty.

An offender who is on parole or probation in another state, who is present in this state without the permission of the compact administrator, and who does not leave this state within seven days after being notified in writing by a law enforcement officer that the offender may not remain in this state without the permission of the compact administrator is guilty of a class C felony. Within twenty-four hours after a law enforcement officer has notified an offender that the offender may not remain within the state without the permission of the compact administrator, the law enforcement officer shall report the notification to the designated officer. An offender who is on parole or probation in another state may not remain in this state without the permission of the compact administrator. In a prosecution for an offense under this section, an offender’s good-faith belief that the offender received permission to be present in this state is an affirmative defense if the offender acted in reasonable reliance upon the written statements of an authorized officer of this state or the state in which the offender is on parole or probation. This defense is not available to a person who remains present in this state after being notified in writing by the compact administrator that the offender does not have permission to be present.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 102, § 4.

Cross-References.

Penalty for class C felony, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

12-65-08.
Interstate transfer or travel of probationers and parolees — Fees.

Upon the approval by the department of corrections and rehabilitation of a request of a probationer or parolee who is under the supervision of the department of corrections and rehabilitation to transfer residence to another state under the interstate compact for adult offender supervision, the probationer or parolee shall pay to the department an application fee of one hundred fifty dollars. The department may waive the offender’s application fee. In addition to the application fee paid by the probationer, the county having jurisdiction over the probationer, upon approval of the application for transfer of that probationer, shall pay to the department a fee of one hundred fifty dollars. In addition to the application fee paid by the parolee, the department, upon approval of the application for transfer of that parolee, shall pay to the department a fee of one hundred fifty dollars. However, if the balance in the fund created pursuant to subsection 3 exceeds seventy-five thousand dollars on June thirtieth of the immediately preceding fiscal year, the department shall waive the entire fee otherwise required to be paid by the county or department.

Any probationer or parolee residing in the state who requests a travel permit to travel to another state shall pay to the department a travel permit fee of ten dollars, unless waived by the department.

The department shall transfer all funds collected or paid under this section to the state treasury for deposit in the probationer and parolee violation transportation fund. The funds deposited in this fund may be spent pursuant to legislative appropriation for the purpose of defraying the costs of returning to the state probationers and parolees who violate their conditions of supervision. The department may contract with a private entity to assist in the administration of the fund.

The department shall adopt rules for implementation of this section.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 99, § 1; 2007, ch. 15, § 4; 2021, ch. 103, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.